West Virginia, session 2026, HB4175.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. INSPECTION OF VEHICLES. §1. Repeal of article requiring that automobiles be inspected.	That §17C-16-1, §17C-16-2, §17C-16-3, §17C-16-4, §17C-16-5, §17C-16-6, §17C-16-7, §17C-16-8, and §17C-16-9 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.